California statutes. Civil Code
The ownership of a thing is the right of one or more persons to possess and use it to the exclusion of others. In this Code, the thing of which there may be ownership is called property.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

655.

There may be ownership of all inanimate things which are capable of appropriation or of manual delivery; of all domestic animals; of all obligations; of such products of labor or skill as the composition of an author, the good will of a business, trade marks and signs, and of rights created or granted by statute.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

656.

Animals wild by nature are the subjects of ownership, while living, only when on the land of the person claiming them, or when tamed, or taken and held in possession, or disabled and immediately pursued.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

657.

Property is either:

l. Real or immovable; or,

2. Personal or movable.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

658.

Real or immovable property consists of:

l. Land;

2. That which is affixed to land;

3. That which is incidental or appurtenant to land;

4. That which is immovable by law; except that for the purposes of sale, emblements, industrial growing crops and things attached to or forming part of the land, which are agreed to be severed before sale or under the contract of sale, shall be treated as goods and be governed by the
 provisions of the title of this code regulating the sales of goods.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1931, Ch. 1070.)
-------------------------------------------

659.

Land is the material of the earth, whatever may be the ingredients of which it is composed, whether soil, rock, or other substance, and includes free or occupied space for an indefinite distance upwards as well as downwards, subject to limitations upon the use of airspace imposed, and rights in the use of airspace granted, by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 860.)
-------------------------------------------

660.

A thing is deemed to be affixed to land when it is attached to it by roots, as in the case of trees, vines, or shrubs; or imbedded in it, as in the case of walls; or permanently resting upon it, as in the case of buildings; or permanently attached to what is thus permanent, as by means of cement, plaster, nails, bolts, or screws; except that for the purposes of sale, emblements, industrial growing crops and things attached to or forming part of the land, which are agreed to be severed before sale or under the contract of sale, shall be treated as goods and be governed by the provisions of the title of this code regulating the sales of goods.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1931, Ch. 1070.)
-------------------------------------------

662.

A thing is deemed to be incidental or appurtenant to land when it is by right used with the land for its benefit, as in the case of a way, or watercourse, or of a passage for light, air, or heat from or across the land of another.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

663.

Every kind of property that is not real is personal.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 2. OWNERSHIP [669. - 742.]



  CHAPTER 1. Owners [669. - [671.]]

669.

All property has an owner, whether that owner is the State, and the property public, or the owner an individual, and the property private. The State may also hold property as a private proprietor.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

[670.]

Section Six Hundred and Seventy. The State is the owner of all land below tide water, and below ordinary high-water mark, bordering upon tide water within the State; of all land below the water of a navigable lake or stream; of all property lawfully appropriated by it to its own use; of all property dedicated to the State; and of all property of which there is no other owner.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1873-74, Ch. 612.)
-------------------------------------------

[671.]

Any person, regardless of their citizenship status, may take, hold, and dispose of property, real or personal, within this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 296, Sec. 12.   (AB 1096)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Modifications of Ownership [678. - 726.]



  ARTICLE 1. Interests in Property [678. - 703.]

678.

The ownership of property is either:

1. Absolute; or,

2. Qualified.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

679.

The ownership of property is absolute when a single person has the absolute dominion over it, and may use it or dispose of it according to his pleasure, subject only to general laws.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

680.

The ownership of property is qualified:

1. When it is shared with one or more persons;

2. When the time of enjoyment is deferred or limited;

3. When the use is restricted.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

681.

The ownership of property by a single person is designated as a sole or several ownership.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

682.

The ownership of property by several persons is either:

(a) Of joint interest.

(b) Of partnership interests.

(c) Of interests in common.

(d) Of community interest of
 spouses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 7.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

682.1.

(a) (1) Community property of spouses, when expressly declared in the transfer document to be community property with right of survivorship, and which may be accepted in writing on the face of the document by a statement signed or initialed by the grantees, shall, upon the death of one of the spouses, pass to the survivor, without administration, pursuant to the terms of the instrument, subject to the same procedures, as property held in joint tenancy. Prior to the death of either spouse, the right of survivorship may be terminated pursuant to the same procedures by which a joint tenancy may be severed.

(2) Part 1 (commencing with Section 5000) of Division 5 of the
 Probate Code and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 13540), Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 13550), and Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 13560) of Part 2 of Division 8 of the Probate Code apply to this property.

(3) For the purposes of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 13550) of Part 2 of Division 8 of the Probate Code, this property shall be treated as if it had passed without administration under Part 2 (commencing with Section 13500) of Division 8 of the Probate Code.

(b) This section does not apply to a joint account in a financial
 institution to which Part 2 (commencing with Section 5100) of Division 5 of the Probate Code applies.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2001, and shall apply to instruments created on or after that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 29, Sec. 1.   (AB 1716)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

683.

(a) A joint interest is one owned by two or more persons in equal shares, by a title created by a single will or transfer, when expressly declared in the will or transfer to be a joint tenancy, or by transfer from a sole owner to himself or herself and others, or from tenants in common or joint tenants to themselves or some of them, or to themselves or any of them and others, or from spouses, when
 holding title as community property or otherwise to themselves or to themselves and others or to one of them and to another or others, when expressly declared in the transfer to be a joint tenancy, or when granted or devised to executors or trustees as joint tenants. A joint tenancy in personal property may be created by a written transfer, instrument, or agreement.

(b) Provisions of this section do not apply to a joint account in a financial institution if Part 2 (commencing with Section 5100) of Division 5 of the Probate Code applies to such account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 9.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

683.1.

No contract or other arrangement made after the effective date of this section between any person, firm, or corporation engaged in the business of renting safe-deposit boxes and the renter or renters of a safe-deposit box, shall create a joint tenancy in or otherwise establish ownership in any of the contents of such safe-deposit box. Any such contract or other arrangement purporting so to do shall be to such extent void and of no effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1597.)
-------------------------------------------

683.2.

(a) Subject to the limitations and requirements of this section, in addition to any other means by which a joint tenancy may be severed, a joint tenant may sever a joint tenancy in real property as to the joint tenant’s interest without the joinder or consent of the other joint tenants by any of the following means:

(1) Execution and delivery of a deed that conveys legal title to the joint tenant’s interest to a third person, whether or not pursuant to an agreement that requires the third person to reconvey legal title to the joint tenant.

(2) Execution of a written instrument that evidences the intent to sever the joint tenancy, including a deed that names the joint tenant as transferee, or of a written declaration that, as to the interest of the joint tenant, the joint tenancy is severed.

(b) Nothing in this section authorizes severance of a joint tenancy contrary to a written agreement of the joint tenants, but a severance contrary to a written agreement does not defeat the rights of a purchaser or encumbrancer for value in good faith and without knowledge of the written agreement.

(c) Severance of a joint tenancy of record by deed, written declaration, or other written instrument pursuant to subdivision (a) is not effective to terminate the right of survivorship of the other joint tenants as to the severing joint tenant’s interest unless one of the
 following requirements is satisfied:

(1) Before the death of the severing joint tenant, the deed, written declaration, or other written instrument effecting the severance is recorded in the county where the real property is located.

(2) The deed, written declaration, or other written instrument effecting the severance is executed and acknowledged before a notary public by the severing joint tenant not earlier than three days before the death of that joint tenant and is recorded in the county where the real property is located not later than seven days after the death of the severing joint tenant.

(d) Nothing in subdivision (c) limits the manner or effect of:

(1) A written instrument executed by all the joint tenants that severs the joint tenancy.

(2) A severance made by or pursuant to a written agreement of all the joint tenants.

(3) A deed from a joint tenant to another joint tenant.

(e) Subdivisions (a) and (b) apply to all joint tenancies in real property, whether the joint tenancy was created before, on, or after January 1, 1985, except that in the case of the death of a joint tenant before January 1, 1985, the validity of a severance under subdivisions (a) and (b) is determined by the law in effect at the time of death. Subdivisions (c) and (d) do not apply to or affect a severance made before January 1, 1986, of a joint tenancy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 157, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

684.

A partnership interest is one owned by several persons, in partnership, for partnership purposes.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

685.

An interest in common is one owned by several persons, not in joint ownership or partnership.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

686.

Every interest created in favor of several persons in their own right is an interest in common, unless acquired by them in partnership, for partnership purposes, or unless declared in its creation to be a joint interest, as provided in Section 683, or unless acquired as community property.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

687.

Community property is property that is community property under Part 2 (commencing with Section 760) of Division 4 of the Family Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 163, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 161 of Ch. 163.)
-------------------------------------------

688.

In respect to the time of enjoyment, an interest in property is either:

1. Present or future; and,

2. Perpetual or limited.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

689.

A present interest entitles the owner to the immediate possession of the property.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

690.

A future interest entitles the owner to the possession of the property only at a future period.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

691.

A perpetual interest has a duration equal to that of the property.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

692.

A limited interest has a duration less than that of the property.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

696.

Two or more future interests may be created to take effect in the alternative, so that if the first in order fails to vest, the next in succession shall be substituted for it, and take effect accordingly.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

697.

A future interest is not void merely because of the improbability of the contingency on which it is limited to take effect.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

698.

When a future interest is limited to successors, heirs, issue, or children, posthumous children are entitled to take in the same manner as if living at the death of their parent.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

699.

Future interests pass by succession, will, and transfer, in the same manner as present interests.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

700.

A mere possibility, such as the expectancy of an heir apparent, is not to be deemed an interest of any kind.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

701.

In respect to real or immovable property, the interests mentioned in this Chapter are denominated estates, and are specially named and classified in Part II of this Division.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

702.

The names and classification of interests in real property have only such application to interests in personal property as is in this Division of the Code expressly provided.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

703.

No future interest in property is recognized by the law, except such as is defined in this Division of the Code.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Conditions of Ownership [707. - 714.7.]

707.

The time when the enjoyment of property is to begin or end may be determined by computation, or be made to depend on events. In the latter case, the enjoyment is said to be upon condition.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

708.

Conditions are precedent or subsequent. The former fix the beginning, the latter the ending, of the right.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

709.

If a condition precedent requires the performance of an act wrong of itself, the instrument containing it is so far void, and the right cannot exist. If it requires the performance of an act not wrong of itself, but otherwise unlawful, the instrument takes effect and the condition is void.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

[710.]

Section Seven Hundred and Ten. Conditions imposing restraints upon marriage, except upon the marriage of a minor, are void; but this does not affect limitations where the intent was not to forbid marriage, but only to give the use until marriage.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1873-74, Ch. 612.)
-------------------------------------------

711.

Conditions restraining alienation, when repugnant to the interest created, are void.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

711.5.

(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 711 and 1916.5, a state or local public entity directly or indirectly providing housing purchase or rehabilitation loans shall have the authority to deny assumptions, or require the denial of assumptions, by a subsequent ineligible purchaser or transferee of the prior borrower of the obligation of any such loan made for the purpose of rehabilitating or providing affordable housing. If such a subsequent purchaser or transferee does not meet such an entity’s eligibility requirements, that entity may accelerate or may require the acceleration of the principal balance of the loan to be all due and payable
 upon the sale or transfer of the property.

(b) As a condition of authorizing assumption of a loan pursuant to this section, the entity may recast the repayment schedule for the remainder of the term of the loan by increasing the interest to the current market rate at the time of assumption, or to such lower rate of interest as is the maximum allowed by an entity that provided any insurance or other assistance which results in an assumption being permitted. Any additional increment of interest produced by increasing the rate of interest upon a loan pursuant to this subdivision shall be transmitted or forwarded to the entity for deposit in the specified fund from which the loan was made, or, if no such fund exists, or the public entity has directed otherwise, then to the general fund of such entity.

(c) The state or local public entity providing assistance as specified in this
 section may implement appropriate measures to assure compliance with this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 971.)
-------------------------------------------

712.

(a) Every provision contained in or otherwise affecting a grant of a fee interest in, or purchase money security instrument upon, real property in this state heretofore or hereafter made, which purports to prohibit or restrict the right of the property owner or his or her agent to display or have displayed on the real property, or on real property owned by others with their consent, or both, signs which are reasonably located, in plain view of the public, are of reasonable dimensions and design, and do not adversely affect public
 safety, including traffic safety, and which advertise the property for sale, lease, or exchange, or advertise directions to the property, by the property owner or his or her agent is void as an unreasonable restraint upon the power of alienation.

(b) This section shall operate retrospectively, as well as prospectively, to the full extent that it may constitutionally operate retrospectively.

(c) A sign that conforms to the ordinance adopted in conformity with Section 713 shall be deemed to be of reasonable dimension and design pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 589, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

713.

(a) Notwithstanding any provision of any ordinance, an owner of real property or his or her agent may display or have displayed on the owner’s real property, and on real property owned by others with their consent, signs which are reasonably located, in plain view of the public, are of reasonable dimensions and design, and do not adversely affect public safety, including traffic safety, as determined by the city, county, or city and county, advertising the following:

(1) That the property is for sale, lease, or exchange by the owner or his or her agent.

(2) Directions to the property.

(3) The owner’s or agent’s name.

(4) The owner’s or agent’s address and telephone number.

(b) Nothing in this section limits any authority which a person or local governmental entity may have to limit or regulate the display or placement of a sign on a private or public right-of-way.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 773, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

714.

(a) Any covenant, restriction, or condition contained in any deed, contract, security instrument, or other instrument affecting the transfer or sale of, or any interest in, real property, and any provision of a governing document, as defined in Section 4150 or 6552, that effectively prohibits or restricts the installation or use of a solar energy system is void and unenforceable.

(b) This section does not apply to provisions that impose reasonable restrictions on solar energy systems. However, it is the policy of the state to promote and encourage the use of solar energy systems and to remove obstacles thereto. Accordingly, reasonable restrictions on a solar energy system are those restrictions that do not significantly increase the cost of the system or significantly decrease its efficiency or specified performance, or that allow for an alternative system of comparable cost, efficiency, and energy conservation benefits.

(c) (1) A solar energy system shall meet applicable health and safety standards and requirements imposed by state and local permitting authorities, consistent with Section 65850.5 of the Government Code.

(2) Solar energy systems used for heating water in
 single family residences and solar collectors used for heating water in commercial or swimming pool applications shall be certified by an accredited listing agency as defined in the Plumbing and Mechanical Codes.

(3) A solar energy system for producing electricity shall also meet all applicable safety and performance standards established by the California Electrical Code, the Institute of Electrical and Electronics Engineers, and accredited testing laboratories such as Underwriters Laboratories and, where applicable, rules of the Public Utilities Commission regarding safety and reliability.

(d) For the purposes of this section:

(1) (A) For solar domestic water heating systems or solar swimming pool heating systems that comply with state and federal law, “significantly” means an amount exceeding
 10 percent of the cost of the system, but in no case more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or decreasing the efficiency of the solar energy system by an amount exceeding 10 percent, as originally specified and proposed.

(B) For photovoltaic systems that comply with state and federal law, “significantly” means an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) over the system cost as originally specified and proposed, or a decrease in system efficiency of an amount exceeding 10 percent as originally specified and proposed.

(2) “Solar energy system” has the same meaning as defined in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 801.5.

(e) (1) Whenever approval is required for the installation or use of a solar energy system, the application for approval shall be processed and
 approved by the appropriate approving entity in the same manner as an application for approval of an architectural modification to the property, and shall not be willfully avoided or delayed.

(2) For an approving entity that is an association, as defined in Section 4080 or 6528, and that is not a public entity, both of the following shall apply:

(A) The approval or denial of an application shall be in writing.

(B) If an application is not denied in writing within 45 days from the date of receipt of the application, the application shall be deemed approved, unless that delay is the result of a reasonable request for additional information.

(f) Any entity, other than a public entity, that willfully violates this section shall be liable to the applicant or
 other party for actual damages occasioned thereby, and shall pay a civil penalty to the applicant or other party in an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(g) In any action to enforce compliance with this section, the prevailing party shall be awarded reasonable attorney’s fees.

(h) (1) A public entity that fails to comply with this section may not receive funds from a state-sponsored grant or loan program for solar energy. A public entity shall certify its compliance with the requirements of this section when applying for funds from a state-sponsored grant or loan program.

(2) A local public entity may not exempt residents in its jurisdiction from the requirements of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 521, Sec. 2.   (AB 2188)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

714.1.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 714, an association may impose reasonable provisions that:

(1) Restrict the installation of solar energy systems in common areas to those systems approved by the association.

(2) Require the owner of a separate interest to obtain the approval of the
 association for the installation of a solar energy system in a separate interest owned by another.

(3) Provide for the maintenance, repair, or replacement of roofs or other building components.

(4) Require installers of solar energy systems to indemnify or reimburse the association or its members for loss or damage caused by the installation, maintenance, or use of the solar energy system.

(b) An association shall not:

(1) Establish a general policy prohibiting the installation or use of a rooftop solar energy system for household purposes on the roof of the building in which the owner resides, or a garage or carport adjacent to the building that has been assigned to the owner for exclusive use.

(2) Require approval by a vote of members owning separate interests in the common interest development, including that specified by Section 4600, for installation of a solar energy system for household purposes on the roof of the building in which the owner resides, or a garage or carport adjacent to the building that has been assigned to the owner for exclusive use.

An action by an association that contravenes paragraph (1) or (2) shall be void and unenforceable.

(c) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Association” has the same meaning as defined in Section 4080 or 6528.

(2) “Common area” has the same meaning as defined in Section 4095 or 6532.

(3) “Separate interest” has the same meaning as
 defined in Section 4185 or 6564.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 818, Sec. 1.   (AB 634)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

714.3.

(a) Any covenant, restriction, or condition contained in any deed, contract, security instrument, or other instrument affecting the transfer or sale of any interest in real property that either effectively prohibits or unreasonably restricts the construction or use of an accessory dwelling unit or junior accessory dwelling unit on a lot zoned for single-family residential use that meets the requirements of Article 2 (commencing with Section 66314) of Chapter 13 or Article 3 (commencing with Section 66333) of Chapter 13 of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code is void and unenforceable.

(b) This section does not apply to provisions that impose reasonable restrictions on accessory dwelling units or junior accessory dwelling units. For purposes of this
 subdivision, “reasonable restrictions” means restrictions that do not unreasonably increase the cost to construct, effectively prohibit the construction of, or extinguish the ability to otherwise construct, an accessory dwelling unit or junior accessory dwelling unit consistent with the provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 66314) or Article 3 (commencing with Section 66333) of Chapter 13 of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code. “Reasonable restrictions” shall not include any fees or other financial requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 22, Sec. 1.   (AB 130)   Effective June 30, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

714.5.

The covenants, conditions, and restrictions or other management documents shall not prohibit the sale, lease, rent, or use of real property on the basis that the structure intended for occupancy on the real property is constructed in an offsite facility or factory, and subsequently moved or transported in sections or modules to the real property. Nothing herein shall preclude the governing instruments from being uniformly applied to all structures subject to the covenants, conditions, and restrictions or other management documents.

This section shall apply to covenants, conditions, and restrictions or other
 management documents adopted on and after the effective date of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1339, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

714.6.

(a) Recorded covenants, conditions, restrictions, or private limits on the use of private or publicly owned land contained in any deed, contract, security instrument, reciprocal easement agreement, or other instrument affecting the transfer or sale of any interest in real property that restrict or prohibit the residential uses of the property, the number, size, or location of the residences that may be built on the property, or that restrict the number of persons or families who may reside on the property, shall not be enforceable against the owner of a housing development, if an approved restrictive covenant housing modification document has been recorded in
 the public record as provided for in this section, except as explicitly provided in this section.

(b) (1) The owner of a housing development shall be entitled to establish that an existing restrictive covenant is unenforceable pursuant to subdivision (a) by submitting a restrictive covenant modification document pursuant to Section 12956.2 of the Government Code that modifies or removes any existing restrictive covenant language that restricts or prohibits the residential uses of the property, the number, size, or location of the residences that may be built on the property, or that restricts the number of persons or families that may reside on the property, to the extent necessary to allow the housing development to proceed
 under the existing declaration of restrictive covenants.

(2) (A) The owner shall submit to the county recorder a copy of the original restrictive covenant, a copy of any notice the owner believes is required pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (g), and any documents the owner believes necessary to establish that the property qualifies as a housing development under this section prior to, or simultaneously with, the submission of the request for recordation of the restrictive covenant modification document.

(B) Before recording the restrictive covenant modification document, pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 12956.2 of the Government Code, the county recorder shall, within five business days of receipt, submit the documentation provided to the county recorder
 by the owner pursuant to subparagraph (A) and the modification document to the county counsel for review. The county counsel shall determine whether the original restrictive covenant document restricts the property in a manner prohibited by subdivision (a), whether the owner has submitted documents sufficient to establish that the property qualifies as a housing development under this section, whether any notice required under this section has been provided, whether any exemption provided in subdivision (g) or (h) applies, and whether the restriction may no longer be enforced against the owner of the housing development and that the owner may record a modification document pursuant to this section.

(C) Pursuant to Section 12956.2 of the Government Code, the county counsel shall return the documents and inform the county recorder of
 the county counsel’s determination within 15 days of submission to the county counsel. If the county counsel is unable to make a determination, the county counsel shall specify the documentation that is needed in order to make the determination. If the county counsel has authorized the county recorder to record the modification document, that authorization shall be noted on the face of the modification or on a cover sheet affixed thereto, and the county recorder shall notify the owner or submitting party of the county counsel’s determination without delay so that the notice described in subparagraph (D) may be given.

(D) Upon being notified that the county counsel has authorized the county recorder to record the modification document, the owner may mail, by certified mail to anyone who the owner knows has an interest in the property or in the
 restrictive covenant, a copy of the modification document, together with a copy of this section and a written explanation that the modification has been applied for and approved for recordation by the county counsel pursuant to this section. That notice shall be deemed given if the notice is actually received by the intended recipient or if the notice is mailed by certified mail both to an address for notice indicated in the restrictive covenant, if any, and to the intended recipient’s address as shown in the last equalized assessment roll, if that address reasonably can be ascertained from the assessment roll. The owner may also publish notice pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code identifying that a modification document pursuant to this section has been submitted to the county recorder and approved for recordation by the county counsel, and that the modification document is available
 for public inspection in the office of the county recorder. The notice shall also identify the property by assessor’s parcel number and mailing address. If no mailing address has been assigned for the property, then the property shall be identified instead by its nearest intersection. If the owner elects to publish notice in this manner, then notice shall be deemed given to anyone whose interest does not appear of record or for whom an address for notice does not appear of record and cannot reasonably be ascertained from the assessment roll. Notice as described in this subparagraph is optional, and failure to provide it shall not, in any manner, invalidate a restrictive covenant modification document recorded pursuant to this section.

(E) The county recorder shall not record the modification document if the county counsel finds that the
 original restrictive covenant document does not contain a restriction prohibited by this section or if the county counsel finds that the property does not qualify as a housing development. If the owner of the property is not yet its record title owner, but is instead a beneficial owner with a right pursuant to a purchase and sale or similar agreement to purchase the property, then the owner shall not record the modification document until the owner closes escrow on the property and becomes its record title owner.

(F) A modification document shall be indexed in the same manner as the original restrictive covenant document being modified. It shall contain a recording reference to the original restrictive covenant document, in the form of a book and page or instrument number, and date of the recording. The effective date of the terms and
 conditions of the modification document shall be the same as the effective date of the original restrictive covenant
 document, subject to any intervening amendments or modifications, except to the extent modified by the recorded modification document.

(3) If the holder of an ownership interest of record in property causes to be recorded a modification document pursuant to this section that modifies or removes a restrictive covenant that is not authorized by this section, the county shall not incur liability for recording the document. The liability that may result from the unauthorized recordation shall be the sole responsibility of the holder of the ownership interest of record who caused the unauthorized recordation.

(4) A restrictive covenant that was originally invalidated by this section shall become and remain enforceable while the property subject to the restrictive
 covenant modification is utilized in any manner that violates the terms of the restrictions required by this section.

(5) If the property is utilized in any manner that violates the terms of the restrictions required by this section, the city or county may, after notice and an opportunity to be heard, record a notice of that violation. If the owner complies with the applicable restrictions, the owner may apply to the agency of the city or county that recorded the notice of violation for a release of the notice of violation, and, if approved by the city or county, a release of the notice of violation may be recorded.

(6) The county recorder may charge a standard recording fee to an owner who submits a modification document for recordation pursuant to this section.

(c) (1) Subject to paragraph (2), this section shall only apply to restrictive covenants that restrict or prohibit the residential uses of the property, the number, size, or location of the residences that may be built on a property, or that restrict the number of persons or families who may reside on a property. This section does not apply to any other covenant, including, but not limited to, covenants that:

(A) Relate to purely aesthetic objective design standards, as long as the objective
 design standards are not applied in a manner that renders the housing development infeasible.

(B) Provide for fees or assessments for the maintenance of common areas.

(C) Provide for limits on the amount of rent that may be charged to tenants.

(2) Paragraph (1) shall not apply to restrictive covenants, fees, and assessments that have not been consistently enforced or assessed prior to the construction of the housing development.

(d) (1) Any suit filed by a party that is deemed to have been given notice as described in subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), which challenges the validity of a restrictive covenant modification
 document pursuant to this section, shall be filed within 35 days of that notice.

(2) In any suit filed to enforce the rights provided in this section or defend against a suit filed against them, a prevailing owner of a housing development, and any successors or assigns, or a holder of a conservation easement, shall be entitled to recover, as part of any judgment, litigation costs and reasonable attorney’s fees, provided that any judgment entered shall be limited to those costs incurred after the modification document was recorded as provided by subdivision (b).

(3) This subdivision shall not prevent the court from awarding any prevailing party litigation costs and reasonable attorney’s fees otherwise authorized by applicable law, including, but not limited to, subdivision (d) of
 Section 815.7.

(e) This section shall not be interpreted to modify, weaken, or invalidate existing laws protecting affordable and fair housing and prohibiting unlawful discrimination in the provision of housing, including, but not limited to, prohibitions on discrimination in, or resulting from, the enforcement of restrictive covenants.

(f) (1) Provided that the restrictions are otherwise compliant with all applicable laws, this section does not invalidate local building codes or other rules regulating either of the following:
